Indiana, session 2026, SB112.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 3-5-7-6.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 6.3. (a) For purposes of this section, "notice of
withdrawal" means a document on which an individual:
(1) withdraws as a candidate or nominee;
(2) provides notice that the individual:
(A) will not accept a nomination;
(B) is no longer a candidate; or
(C) does not wish the individual's name to appear on the
ballot as a candidate;
(3) provides a written statement under IC 3-8-7-20 requesting
that the individual's name be printed as nominated by
petition, convention, subsequent petition, or subsequent
convention; or
(4) provides a written election under IC 3-8-7-21 of which
nomination the individual will accept.
(b) Whenever an individual files a notice of withdrawal on
which the individual lists an address that is different from the
address set forth on the individual's voter registration record, the
individual's signature on the notice of withdrawal constitutes a
request to the county voter registration office that the address on
the individual's voter registration record be the same as the
SEA 112

2
address the individual uses on the notice of withdrawal.
SEA 112

President of the Senate
President Pro Tempore
Speaker of the House of Representatives
Governor of the State of Indiana
Date: Time:
SEA 112